North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-30.2 Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
47-30.2-22.
(402) Content of report.

The report filed under section 47-30.2-21 must:

Be signed by or on behalf of the holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy;

Be filed electronically in a secure format approved by the administrator which protects confidential information of the apparent owner in the same manner as required of the administrator and the administrator’s agent under sections 47-30.2-71, 47-30.2-72, and 47-30.2-73;

Describe the property;

Except for a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument, contain the name, if known, last-known address, if known, and social security number or taxpayer identification number, if known or readily ascertainable, of the apparent owner of property with a value of twenty-five dollars or more;

For an amount held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, contain the name and last-known address of the insured, annuitant, or other apparent owner of the policy or contract and of the beneficiary;

For property held in or removed from a safe deposit box, indicate the location of the property, where it may be inspected by the administrator, and any amounts owed to the holder under section 47-30.2-35;

Contain the commencement date for determining abandonment under sections 47-30.2-04, 47-30.2-05, 47-30.2-06, 47-30.2-07, 47-30.2-08, 47-30.2-09, 47-30.2-10, 47-30.2-11, 47-30.2-12, 47-30.2-13, and 47-30.2-14;

State that the holder has complied with the notice requirements of section 47-30.2-26;

Identify property that is a non-freely transferable security and explain why it is a non-freely transferable security; and

Contain other information the commissioner prescribes by rules.

A report under section 47-30.2-21 may include in the aggregate items valued under twenty-five dollars each. If the report includes items in the aggregate valued under twenty-five dollars each, the administrator may not require the holder to provide the name and address of an apparent owner of an item unless the information is necessary to verify or process a claim in progress by the apparent owner.

A report under section 47-30.2-21 may include personal information about the apparent owner or the apparent owner’s property to the extent not otherwise prohibited by state and federal law.

The administrator and any state employee conducting an examination on the administrator’s behalf are exempt from chapter 6-08.1.

If a holder has changed the holder’s name while holding property presumed abandoned or is a successor to another person that previously held the property for the apparent owner, the holder shall include in the report under section 47-30.2-21 the holder’s former name or the name of the previous holder, if any, and the known name and address of each previous holder of the property.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-23.
(403) When report to be filed.

Except as otherwise provided under this section, the report under section 47-30.2-21 must be filed before November first of each year and cover the twelve months preceding July first of that year.

Subject to subsection 3, the report under section 47-30.2-21 to be filed by a life insurance company must be filed before May first of each year for the immediately preceding calendar year.

Before the date for filing the report under section 47-30.2-21, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the administrator to extend the time for filing. The administrator may grant an extension.

The commissioner may grant an extension of the reporting date for good cause in the event of a national or state emergency.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-24.
(404) Retention of records by holder.

A holder required to file a report under section 47-30.2-21 shall retain records for ten years after the later of the date the report was filed or the last date a timely report was due to be filed, unless a shorter period is provided by rule of the commissioner. The holder may satisfy the requirement to retain records under this section through an agent. The records must contain:

The information required to be included in the report;

The date, place, and nature of the circumstances that gave rise to the property right;

The amount or value of the property;

The last address of the apparent owner, if known to the holder; and

If the holder sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state traveler’s checks, money orders, or similar instruments, other than third-party bank checks, on which the holder is directly liable, a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding indicating the state and date of issue.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-25.
(405) Property reportable and payable or deliverable absent owner demand.

Property is reportable and payable or deliverable under this chapter even if the owner fails to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-26.
(501) Notice to apparent owner by holder.

Subject to subsection 2, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall send to the apparent owner notice by first-class United States mail that complies with section 47-30.2-27 in a format acceptable to the administrator not more than one hundred twenty days before filing the report under section 47-30.2-21 if:

The holder has in the holder’s records an address for the apparent owner which the holder’s records do not disclose to be invalid and is sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner; and

The value of the property is twenty-five dollars or more.

If an apparent owner has consented to receive electronic mail delivery from the holder, the holder shall send the notice described in subsection 1 both by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner’s last-known mailing address and by electronic mail, unless the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address is invalid.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-27.
(502) Contents of notice by holder.

Notice under section 47-30.2-26 must contain a heading that reads substantially as follows:

The notice under section 47-30.2-26 must:

Identify the holder and provide a name, address, telephone number, and electronic-mail address at which to contact the holder;

Identify the nature and, except for property that does not have a fixed value, the value of the property that is the subject of the notice;

State that the property will be turned over to the administrator;

State that after the property is turned over to the administrator an apparent owner that seeks return of the property shall file a claim with the administrator;

State that property that is not legal tender of the United States may be sold by the administrator in accordance with section 47-30.2-40; and

Provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to prevent the holder from reporting and paying or delivering the property to the administrator.

“Notice. The State of North Dakota requires us to notify you that your property may be transferred to the custody of the North Dakota unclaimed property administrator if you do not contact us before (insert date that is thirty days after the date of this notice).”

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-28.
(503) Notice by administrator.

The administrator shall give notice to an apparent owner that property is presumed abandoned and appears to be owned by the apparent owner is held by the administrator under this chapter.

In providing notice under subsection 1, the administrator shall:

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision b, send written notice by first-class United States mail to each apparent owner of property valued at twenty-five dollars or more held by the administrator, unless the administrator determines that a mailing by first-class United States mail would not be received by the apparent owner, and, in the case of a security held in an account for which the apparent owner had consented to receiving electronic mail from the holder, send notice by electronic mail if the electronic-mail address of the apparent owner is known to the administrator instead of by first-class United States mail; or

Send the notice to the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address if the administrator does not have a valid United States mail address for an apparent owner but has an electronic-mail address that the administrator does not know to be invalid.

In addition to the notice under subsection 2, the administrator shall:

Publish in the biennial report required under section 54-06-04 and shall include:

The total value of property received by the administrator during the preceding biennium, taken from the reports under section 47-30.2-21; and

The total value of claims paid by the administrator during the biennium period;

Maintain a website or database accessible by the public and electronically searchable which contains the names reported to the administrator of apparent owners for whom property that meets or exceeds the searchable value as set by the commissioner is being held by the administrator. Property that does not meet or exceed the searchable value must continue to be held by the administrator but may not appear in the searchable website or database.

The website or database maintained under subdivision b of subsection must include instructions for filing with the administrator a claim to property and a printable claim form with instructions for the form’s use.

In addition to giving notice under subsection 2, publishing the information under subdivision a of subsection 3, and maintaining the website or database under subdivision b of subsection 3, the administrator may use other printed publication, telecommunication, the internet, or other media to inform the public of the existence of unclaimed property held by the administrator.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-29.
(504) Cooperation among state officers and agencies to locate apparent owner.

Unless prohibited by a law of this state other than this chapter, on request of the administrator, each officer, agency, board, commission, division, and department of this state, any body politic and corporate created by this state for a public purpose, and each political subdivision of this state shall make its books and records available to the administrator and cooperate with the administrator to determine the current address of an apparent owner of property held by the administrator under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-30.
(601) Definition of good faith.

In sections 47-30.2-30, 47-30.2-31, 47-30.2-32, 47-30.2-33, 47-30.2-34, 47-30.2-35, 47-30.2-36, 47-30.2-37, and 47-30.2-38, payment or delivery of property is made in good faith if a holder:

Had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known, that the property was required or permitted to be paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter; or

Made payment or delivery:

In response to a demand by the administrator or administrator’s agent; or

Under a guidance or ruling issued by the administrator which the holder reasonably believed required or permitted the property to be paid or delivered.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-31.
(602) Dormancy charge.

A holder may deduct a dormancy charge from property required to be paid or delivered to the administrator if:

An enforceable written contract between the holder and the apparent owner authorizes imposition of the charge for the apparent owner’s failure to claim the property within a specified time; and

The holder regularly imposes the charge and regularly does not reverse or otherwise cancel the charge.

Charges authorized under this section may only be charged until the respective property is deemed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-32.
(603) Payment or delivery of property to administrator.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, on filing a report under section 47-30.2-21, the holder shall pay or deliver to the administrator the property described in the report.

If property in a report under section 47-30.2-21 is an automatically renewable deposit and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from paying the deposit to the administrator at the time of the report, the date for payment of the property to the administrator is extended until a penalty or forfeiture no longer would result from payment, if the holder informs the administrator of the extended date.

If property reported to the administrator under section 47-30.2-21 is a security, the administrator may:

Make an endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order on behalf of the apparent owner to invoke the duty of the issuer, the transfer agent of the issuer, or the securities intermediary to transfer the security; or

Dispose of the security under section 47-30.2-41.

If the holder of property reported to the administrator under section 47-30.2-21 is the issuer of a certificated security, the administrator may obtain a replacement certificate in physical or book-entry form under section 41-08-38. An indemnity bond is not required.

The administrator shall establish procedures for the registration, issuance, method of delivery, transfer, and maintenance of securities delivered to the administrator by a holder.

An issuer, holder, or transfer agent acting under this section under instructions of and on behalf of the issuer or holder is not liable to the apparent owner for, and shall be indemnified by the state against, a claim arising with respect to property after the property has been delivered in good faith to the administrator.

A holder is not required to deliver to the administrator a security identified by the holder as a non-freely transferable security. If the administrator or holder determines that a security is no longer a non-freely transferable security, the holder shall deliver the security on the next regular date prescribed for delivery of securities under this chapter. The holder shall make a determination annually whether a security identified in a report filed under section 47-30.2-21 as a non-freely transferable security is no longer a non-freely transferable security.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-33.
(604) Effect of payment or delivery of property to administrator.

On payment or delivery of property to the administrator under this chapter, the administrator as agent for the state assumes custody and responsibility for safekeeping the property. A holder that pays or delivers property in full to the administrator in good faith and substantially complies with sections 47-30.2-26 and 47-30.2-27 is relieved of liability to the extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any claim arising after the payment or delivery with respect to payment or delivery of that property to the administrator.

To the extent of the value of property paid or delivered as measured on the date of delivery, this state shall defend and indemnify a holder against liability on a claim against the holder resulting from the payment or delivery of property to the administrator made in good faith and after the holder substantially complied with sections 47-30.2-26 and 47-30.2-27.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-34.
(605) Recovery of property by holder from administrator.

A holder that under this chapter pays money to the administrator may file a claim for reimbursement from the administrator of the amount paid if the holder:

Paid the money in error; or

After paying the money to the administrator, paid money to a person the holder reasonably believed was entitled to the money.

A holder that under this chapter delivers property other than money to the administrator may file a claim for return of the property from the administrator if:

The holder delivered the property in error; or

The apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder.

If a claim for return of property under subsection 2 is made, the holder shall include with the claim evidence sufficient to establish that:

The apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder and that the property was delivered to the apparent owner in full; or

The property was delivered by the holder to the administrator in error.

The administrator may determine that an affidavit submitted by a holder is evidence sufficient to establish that the holder is entitled to reimbursement or to recover property under this section.

A holder is not required to pay a fee or other charge for reimbursement or return of property under this section.

Not later than ninety days after a claim is filed under subsection 1 or 2, the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give the claimant notice of the decision in a record.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-35.
(606) Property removed from safe deposit box.

Property removed from a safe deposit box and delivered under this chapter to the administrator under this chapter is subject to the holder’s right to reimbursement for the cost of opening the box and a lien or contract providing reimbursement to the holder for unpaid rent charges for the box. The administrator shall reimburse the holder from the proceeds remaining after deducting the expense incurred by the administrator in selling the property.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-36.
(607) Crediting income or gain to owner’s account.

If property in the form of a security is paid or delivered to the administrator under this chapter, the owner is entitled to receive any dividends or other increments realized or accruing on the security for as long as the security is held by the administrator, if the total amount of cash due the owner exceeds five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-37.
(608) Administrator’s option as to custody.

The administrator may decline to take custody of property reported under section 47-30.2-21 if the administrator determines that:

The property has a value less than the estimated expenses of notice and sale of the property; or

Taking custody of the property would be unlawful.

A holder may pay or deliver property to the administrator before the property is presumed abandoned under this chapter if the holder:

Sends the apparent owner of the property notice required by section 47-30.2-26 and provides the administrator evidence of the holder’s compliance with this subsection;

Includes with the payment or delivery a report regarding the property conforming to section 47-30.2-22; and

First obtains the administrator’s consent in a record to accept payment or delivery.

A holder’s request for the administrator’s consent under subdivision c of subsection 2 must be in a record. If the administrator fails to respond to the request within thirty days after receipt of the request, the administrator is deemed to consent to the payment or delivery of the property and the payment or delivery is considered to have been made in good faith.

On payment or delivery of property under subsection 2, the property is presumed abandoned.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-38.
(609) Disposition of property having no substantial value; immunity from liability.

If the administrator takes custody of property delivered under this chapter and later determines that the property has no substantial commercial value or that the cost of disposing of the property will exceed the value of the property, the administrator may return the property to the holder or destroy or otherwise dispose of the property.

An action or proceeding may not be commenced against the state, an agency of the state, the administrator, another officer, employee, or agent of the state, or a holder for or because of an act of the administrator under this section, except for intentional misconduct or malfeasance.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-39.
(610) Periods of limitation and repose.

Expiration before, on, or after the effective date of this chapter, of a period of limitation on an owner’s right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order, does not prevent the property from being presumed abandoned or affect the duty of a holder under this chapter to file a report or pay or deliver property to the administrator.

The administrator may not commence an action or proceeding to enforce this chapter with respect to the reporting, payment, or delivery of property more than five years after the holder filed a nonfraudulent report under section 47-30.2-21 with the administrator. The parties may agree in a record to extend the limitation in this subsection.

The administrator may not commence an action, proceeding, or examination with respect to a duty of a holder under this chapter more than ten years after the duty arose.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-40.
(701) Public sale of property.

Subject to section 47-30.2-41, not earlier than three years after receipt of property presumed abandoned, the administrator may sell the property.

Before selling property under subsection 1, the administrator shall give notice to the public of:

The date of the sale; and

A reasonable description of the property.

A sale under subsection 1 must be to the highest bidder:

At public sale at a location in this state which the administrator determines to be the most favorable market for the property;

On the internet; or

On another forum the administrator determines is likely to yield the highest net proceeds of sale.

The administrator may decline the highest bid at a sale under this section and reoffer the property for sale if the administrator determines the highest bid is insufficient.

If a sale held under this section is to be conducted other than on the internet, the administrator shall publish on the administrator’s website a notice of the sale, at least ten days before the date of sale.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-41.
(702) Disposal of securities.

The administrator may not sell or otherwise liquidate a security until three years after the administrator receives the security.

The administrator may not sell a security listed on an established stock exchange for less than the price prevailing on the exchange at the time of sale. The administrator may sell a security not listed on an established exchange by any commercially reasonable method.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-42.
(704) Purchaser owns property after sale.

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the administrator under this chapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner, a previous holder, or a person claiming through the owner or holder. The administrator shall execute documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership to the purchaser.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-43.
(705) Military medal or decoration.

The administrator may not sell a medal or decoration awarded for military service in the armed forces of the United States.

The administrator, with the consent of the respective organization under subdivision a or agency under subdivision b may deliver a medal or decoration described in subsection 1 to be held in custody for the owner, to:

The state historical society; or

The agency that awarded the medal or decoration.

On delivery under subsection 2, the administrator is not responsible for safekeeping the medal or decoration.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-44.
(801) Deposit of funds by administrator.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall deposit to the credit of the common schools trust fund all funds received under this chapter, including proceeds from the sale of property under sections 47-30.2-40, 47-30.2-41, 47-30.2-42, and 47-30.2-43.

The department shall maintain an account with an amount of funds the commissioner reasonably estimates is sufficient to pay claims allowed under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-45.
(802) Administrator to retain records of property.

The administrator shall:

Record and retain the name and last-known address of each person shown on a report filed under section 47-30.2-21 to be the apparent owner of property delivered to the administrator;

Record and retain the name and last-known address of each insured or annuitant and beneficiary shown on the report;

For each policy of insurance or annuity contract listed in the report of an insurance company, record and retain the policy or account number, the name of the company, and the amount due or paid; and

For each apparent owner listed in the report, record and retain the name of the holder that filed the report and the amount due or paid.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-46.
Deposit of funds — Continuing appropriation.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, all funds received under this chapter, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under section 47-30.2-40, must be promptly deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the common schools trust fund.

There is appropriated annually the amounts necessary to pay all expense deductions under this section, including:

Any costs in connection with the sale of abandoned property;

Costs of mailing, publication, and outreach efforts in connection with any abandoned property;

Reasonable service charges;

Costs incurred in examining records of holders of property and in collecting the property from those holders;

Funds for the payment of claims;

Funds for the payment of holder refunds; and

Funds for attorney’s fees and all other reasonable costs and expenses incurred in an action or suit.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-47.
(804) Administrator holds property as custodian for owner.

Property received by the administrator under this chapter is held in custody for the benefit of the owner and is not owned by the state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-48.
(901) Claim of another state to recover property.

If the administrator knows that property held by the administrator under this chapter is subject to a superior claim of another state, the administrator shall:

Report and pay or deliver the property to the other state; or

Return the property to the holder so that the holder may pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator is not required to enter into an agreement to transfer property to the other state under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-49.
(902) When property subject to recovery by another state.

Property held under this chapter by the administrator is subject to the right of another state to take custody of the property if:

The property was paid or delivered to the administrator because the records of the holder did not reflect a last-known address of the apparent owner in the other state and:

The other state establishes that the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was in the other state; or

Under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment;

The records of the holder did not accurately identify the owner of the property, the last-known address of the owner was in another state, and, under the law of the other state, the property has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment;

The property was subject to the custody of the administrator of this state under section 47-30.2-19 and, under the law of the state of domicile of the holder, the property has become subject to a claim by the state of domicile of the holder of abandonment; or

The property:

Is a sum payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state and delivered to the administrator under section 47-30.2-20; and

Under the law of the other state, has become subject to a claim by the other state of abandonment.

A claim by another state to recover property under this section must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, unless the administrator waives presentation of the form.

The administrator shall decide a claim under this section not later than ninety days after it is presented. If the administrator determines that the other state is entitled under subsection 1 to custody of the property, the administrator shall allow the claim and pay or deliver the property to the other state.

The administrator may require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its agents, officers, and employees against any liability on a claim to the property.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-50.
(903) Claim for property by person claiming to be owner.

A person claiming to be the owner of property held under this chapter by the administrator may file a claim for the property and the claim must be on a form prescribed by the administrator. The claimant shall verify the claim as to the claim’s completeness and accuracy.

The administrator may waive the requirement in subsection 1 and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:

The person receiving the property or payment is shown to be the apparent owner included on a report filed under section 47-30.2-21;

The administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled to receive the property or payment; and

The property has a value as provided by rules adopted by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-51.
(904) When administrator shall honor claim for property.

The administrator shall pay or deliver property to a claimant under subsection 1 of section 47-30.2-50 if the administrator receives evidence sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the administrator that the claimant is the owner of the property.

Not later than ninety days after a claim is filed under subsection 1 of section 47-30.2-50, the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give the claimant notice in a record of the decision.

If the claim is denied under subsection 2:

The administrator shall inform the claimant of the reason for the denial and specify what additional evidence, if any, is required for the claim to be allowed;

The claimant may file an amended claim with the administrator or commence an action under section 47-30.2-53; and

The administrator may consider an amended claim filed under subdivision b as an initial claim.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-52.
(905) Allowance of claim for property.

Not later than sixty days after a claim is allowed under subsection 2 of section 47-30.2-51, the administrator shall pay or deliver to the owner the property or pay to the owner the net proceeds of a sale of the property, together with income or gain to which the owner is entitled under section 47-30.2-36. On request of the owner, the administrator may sell or liquidate a security and pay the net proceeds to the owner, even if the security had been held by the administrator for fewer than three years or the administrator has not complied with the notice requirements under section 47-30.2-41.

Property held under this chapter by the administrator is subject to a claim for the payment of an enforceable debt the owner owes in this state for:

Child support arrearages, including child support collection costs and child support arrearages that are combined with maintenance;

A civil or criminal fine or penalty, court costs, a surcharge, or restitution imposed by a final order of an administrative agency or a final court judgment; or

State or local taxes, penalties, and interest that have been determined to be delinquent or as to which notice has been recorded with the state or local taxing authority.

The state and local agencies may make periodic inquiries to the administrator to determine whether an apparent owner included in the unclaimed property records of this state has enforceable debts described in subsection 2. The administrator first shall apply the property or net proceeds of a sale of property held by the administrator to a debt under subsection 2 of an apparent owner which appears in the records of the administrator and deliver the amount to the appropriate state or local agency.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-53.
(906) Action by person whose claim is denied.

Not later than one hundred eighty days after filing a claim under subsection 1 of section 47-30.2-50, the claimant may commence an action against the board in the Burleigh County District Court to establish a claim that has been denied or deemed denied under section 47-30.2-50. If the board is successful in a proceeding brought under this section, the district court shall allow the board to recover court costs; reasonable costs, fees, disbursements, and expenses incurred by the board in the proceeding; and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-54.
(1001) Verified report of property.

If a person does not file a report under section 47-30.2-21 or the administrator believes that a person may have filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, the administrator may require the person to file a verified report in a form prescribed by the administrator. The verified report must:

State whether the person is holding property reportable under this chapter;

Describe property not previously reported or about which the administrator has inquired;

Specifically identify property described under subsection about which there is a dispute whether it is reportable under this chapter; and

State the amount or value of the property.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-55.
(1002) Examination of records to determine compliance.

The administrator, at reasonable times and on reasonable notice, may:

Examine the records of a person, including examination of appropriate records in the possession of an agent of the person under examination, if the records are reasonably necessary to determine whether the person has complied with this chapter;

Issue an administrative subpoena requiring the person or agent of the person to make records available for examination; and

Bring an action seeking judicial enforcement of the subpoena.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-56.
(1003) Rules for conducting examination.

The commissioner shall adopt rules governing an examination under section 47-30.2-55, including rules for use of an estimation, extrapolation, and statistical sampling in conducting an examination. An examination commenced after adoption of rules under this subsection must comply with the rules.

If a person subject to examination under section 47-30.2-55 has filed the reports required under sections 47-30.2-21 and 47-30.2-54 and has retained the records required by section 47-30.2-24, the following apply:

The examination must include a review of the person’s records.

The examination may be based on an estimate if no records are available.

The person conducting the examination shall consider the evidence presented in good faith by the person in preparing the findings of the examination under section 47-30.2-60.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

47-30.2-57.
(1004) Records obtained in examination.

Records obtained from a private entity for purposes of an examination under this chapter and records, including work papers, compiled by the administrator or the administrator’s agent in the course of conducting an examination under section 47-30.2-55 are subject to the security provisions of sections 47-30.2-71, 47-30.2-72, and 47-30.2-73 and are confidential records. However, the administrator or administrator’s agent may furnish information to the attorney general, other state agencies, a prosecuting official requiring the information for use in the prosecuting official’s official duties, or for legislative investigations under chapter 54-03.2. Confidential information furnished by the administrator or the administrator’s agent to a third party under this section remains confidential while in the possession of the third party. Confidential information received by the administrator or administrator’s agent from a third party under this section remains confidential while in the possession of the administrator or administrator’s agent. The administrator or the administrator’s agent’s final and completed examination reports are records open to the public. The final examination report may not contain confidential documentation or working papers unless one of the exceptions in this section applies.

The records subject to subsection 1:

May be used by the board in an action to collect property or otherwise enforce this chapter;

May be used in a joint examination conducted with or pursuant to agreements with other states, the federal government, or other governmental entities;

May be disclosed at the discretion of the commissioner, on request, to the person that administers the unclaimed property law of another state for that state’s use in circumstances equivalent to circumstances described in sections 47-30.2-54, 47-30.2-55, 47-30.2-56, 47-30.2-57, 47-30.2-58, 47-30.2-59, 47-30.2-60, 47-30.2-61, and 47-30.2-62. A state to which information is disclosed shall maintain the confidentiality and security of information obtained in a manner substantially equivalent to sections 47-30.2-71, 47-30.2-72, and 47-30.2-73;

May be required to be produced under section 44-04-18.11; and

May be required to be produced by the administrator on request of the person subject to the examination in an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the property.

The administrator or any state employee conducting an examination on the administrator’s behalf are exempt from chapter 6-08.1.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 337, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.